Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1009
Attachment or garnishment; delivery of property to defendant or garnishee; conditions.

(1) The sheriff shall deliver the property attached to the person in whose possession it was found, and property or money seized in garnishment, to the defendant in the attachment proceedings, if the defendant be the true owner thereof, upon the delivery by such person, either to the sheriff at any time before the return of the sheriff of the attachment or garnishment process or to the clerk of the court, after the return by the sheriff to the court, of an undertaking to the plaintiff, with one or more sufficient sureties resident in the county, or a bonding company authorized to do business in the State of Nebraska, to the effect that the parties to the same are bound, in the amount of the appraised value thereof, or in the case of garnishment, in the amount of the value of the property or money in the hands of the garnishee, that the property or its appraised value in money shall be forthcoming to answer the judgment of the court in the action; but if it shall appear to the court that any part of said property has been lost or destroyed by unavoidable accident, the value thereof shall be remitted to the person so bound. In case of garnishment, the garnishee shall be discharged upon the approval of said bond.

(2) If the defendant presents to the court, by affidavit or otherwise, specific facts demonstrating that no sureties are necessary to insure that the property or its appraised value in money shall be forthcoming to answer the judgment of the court in the action, the court may allow the undertaking to be executed by the defendant alone.

R.S.1867, Code § 206, p. 426;

R.S.1913, § 7740;

Laws 1915, c. 146, § 1, p. 316;

C.S.1922, § 8684;

C.S.1929, § 20-1009;

R.S.1943, § 25-1009;

Laws 1980, LB 597, § 5.

Defendant who has given "forthcoming bond" under this section may move to dissolve attachment. Burnham-Munger-Root D. G. Co. v. Strahl, 102 Neb. 142, 166 N.W. 266 (1918).

Principal in redelivery bond is estopped, in action thereon, to deny that he is owner of the attached property. Commercial Nat. Bank of Kearney v. Faser, 99 Neb. 105, 155 N.W. 601 (1915).

After property is returned to officer, party may claim title in proper action. Runquist v. Anderson, 64 Neb. 755, 90 N.W. 760 (1902).

Principal in bond is estopped to claim title to property. Cooper v. Davis Mill Co., 48 Neb. 420, 67 N.W. 178 (1896).

Only officer holding writ may approve. Dewey & Stone v. Kavanaugh, 45 Neb. 233, 63 N.W. 396 (1895).

Sureties are not liable unless bond is approved and property delivered; need not indorse approval on bond; implied approval. Cortelyou v. Maben, 40 Neb. 512, 59 N.W. 94 (1894).

Defendant may move to dissolve attachment after redelivery bond is given. Wilson v. Shepherd, 15 Neb. 15, 16 N.W. 826 (1883).

Must allege order of sale had been made. Young v. Joseph Bros. & Davidson, 5 Neb. Unof. 559, 99 N.W. 522 (1904).